en: arrack flavouring
sv: arraksarom

en: mocha flavouring
sv: mockaarom

en: natural mocha flavouring
nl: natuurlijk mokka aroma

en: plum flavouring
de: Pflaumenaroma, Pflaumen-Aroma
es: aroma de ciruela
hr: aroma šljive
it: aroma di prugna

en: natural peanut flavouring
de: natürliches Erdnussaroma
hr: prirodna aroma kikirikija
it: aroma naturale di arachidi

en: rum flavouring
hr: aroma rum, rum aroma
it: aroma di rum
pl: aromat rumowy

en: natural rum flavouring, rum natural flavouring
de: natürliches Rum-Aroma, natürliches Rumaroma
fi: luontainen rommiaromi
fr: arôme naturel de rhum
hr: prirodna aroma ruma
hu: természetes rumaroma, természetes rum aroma
it: aroma naturale di rum
pl: naturalny aromat rumowy

en: rum flavouring preparation
hr: pripravak s aromom ruma
it: preparazione aromatizzante al rum

fr: arôme naturel de champignon
de: natürliches Pilzaroma
es: aroma natural de champiñón
it: aroma naturale di fungo
nl: natuurlijk paddenstoelaroma

en: pine flavouring
es: aroma de pino, aromas de pino
hr: aroma borovice
it: aroma di pino

en: eucalyptus flavouring
de: Eukalyptusaroma, Eukalyptus-Aroma
es: aroma de eucalipto
fr: Arôme d'eucalyptus
hr: aroma eukaliptusa
it: aroma di eucalipto

en: citric flavouring
de: Zitrusaroma, Citrusaroma
es: aroma natural a citricos
hr: aroma agruma
it: aroma citrico

en: natural orange flavouring with other natural flavouring
de: natürliches Orangenaroma mit anderen natürlichen Aromen
fi: luontainen appelsiiniaromi ja muita luontaisia aromeja, luontainen appelsiiniaromi ja muut luontaiset aromit, luontainen appelsiiniaromi joka sisältää muita luontaisia aromeja
fr: arômes naturels d'orange avec autres arômes naturels, arôme naturel d'orange avec autres arômes naturels
hr: prirodna aroma naranče s drugim prirodnim aromama
nl: natuurlijk sinaasappelaroma met andere natuurlijke aroma's, natuurlijke sinaasappelaroma's met andere natuurlijke aroma's
pl: naturalny aromat pomarańczowy z innymi naturalnymi aromatami, naturalny aromat pomarańczowy z innymi aromatami naturalnymi
sv: naturlig apelsinarom med andra naturliga aromer

en: sweet lime flavouring
fr: arôme de limette
hr: aroma slatke limete
hu: édes lime aroma
it: aroma di lime dolce

en: natural sweet lime flavouring
fr: arôme naturel de limette
hr: prirodna aroma slatke limete
hu: természetes édes lime aroma, édes természetes lime aroma
it: aroma naturale di lime dolce

en: lemon flavouring, lemon scent
ar: نكهات الليمون
de: ZitronenAroma
es: sabor a limón, aroma de limon
fi: sitruuna-aromi
fr: arôme de citron, arôme citron, odeur de citron
hr: aroma limuna
hu: citromaroma, citrom aroma
is: sítrónubragðefni
it: aroma di limone
nl: citroenaroma
pl: aromat cytrynowy
sv: citronarom

en: natural lemon flavouring
de: natürliches Zitronenaroma, natürliches Zitronen-aroma
es: Saborizante natural de limón
fi: luontainen sitruuna-aromi
fr: arôme naturel de citron, arômes naturels de citron
hr: prirodna aroma limuna
hu: természetes citromaroma, természetes citrom aroma
id: perisa alami lemon
it: aroma naturale di limone
nl: natuurlijk citroenaroma
pl: naturalny aromat cytryny
pt: aroma natural de limão
ru: натуральный ароматизатор лимон

fr: arômes naturels de réglisse
de: natürliche Lakritz-Aromen
es: aromas naturales de regaliz
it: aromi naturali di liquirizia
nl: natuurlijke droparoma's
pl: naturalne aromaty lukrecji
sv: naturliga lakritsaromer

fr: arôme naturel de réglisse
de: natürliches Lakritz-Aroma
es: aroma natural de regaliz
it: aroma naturale di liquirizia
nl: natuurlijk droparoma
pl: naturalny aromat lukrecji
sv: naturlig lakritsarom

fr: arôme naturel de citron avec autres arômes naturels, arômes naturels de citron avec autres arômes naturels, arôme naturel de citron et autres arômes naturels
de: natürliches Zitronenaroma mit anderen natürliche Aromen
fi: luontainen sitruuna-aromi ja muut luontaiset aromit
hr: prirodna aroma limuna s drugim prirodnim aromama, prirodna aroma mente citrusa sa ostalim prirodnim aromama
it: aroma naturale di limone con altri aromi naturali
pl: naturalny aromat cytrynowy z innymi naturalnymi aromatami, naturalny aromat cytrynowy z innymi aromatami naturalnymi